Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 2. VOTER QUALIFICATIONS AND REGISTRATION

CHAPTER 13. APPLICATION FOR REGISTRATION; INITIAL REGISTRATION

SUBCHAPTER A. ELIGIBILITY; MANNER OF APPLYING FOR REGISTRATION

Sec. 13.001. ELIGIBILITY FOR REGISTRATION. (a) To be eligible for registration as a voter in this state, a person must:

(1) be 18 years of age or older;

(2) be a United States citizen;

(3) not have been determined by a final judgment of a court exercising probate jurisdiction to be:

(A) totally mentally incapacitated; or

(B) partially mentally incapacitated without the right to vote;

(4) not have been finally convicted of a felony or, if so convicted, must have:

(A) fully discharged the person's sentence, including any term of incarceration, parole, or supervision, or completed a period of probation ordered by any court; or

(B) been pardoned or otherwise released from the resulting disability to vote; and

(5) be a resident of the county in which application for registration is made.

(b) To be eligible to apply for registration, a person must, on the date the registration application is submitted to the registrar, be at least 17 years and 10 months of age and satisfy the requirements of Subsection (a) except for age.

(c) For purposes of Subsection (a)(4), a person is not considered to have been finally convicted of an offense for which the criminal proceedings are deferred without an adjudication of guilt.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 6.02, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 850, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 614 (H.B. 417), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 744 (H.B. 1226), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 13.002. APPLICATION REQUIRED. (a) A person desiring to register to vote must submit an application to the registrar of the county in which the person resides. Except as provided by Subsection (e), an application must be submitted by personal delivery, by mail, or by telephonic facsimile machine in accordance with Sections 13.143(d) and (d-2).

(b) A registration application must be in writing and signed by the applicant.

(c) A registration application must include:

(1) the applicant's first name, middle name, if any, last name, and former name, if any;

(2) the month, day, and year of the applicant's birth;

(3) a statement that the applicant is a United States citizen;

(4) a statement that the applicant is a resident of the county;

(5) a statement that the applicant has not been determined by a final judgment of a court exercising probate jurisdiction to be:

(A) totally mentally incapacitated; or

(B) partially mentally incapacitated without the right to vote;

(6) a statement that the applicant has not been finally convicted of a felony or that the applicant is a felon eligible for registration under Section 13.001;

(7) the applicant's residence address or, if the residence has no address, the address at which the applicant receives mail and a concise description of the location of the applicant's residence;

(8) the following information:

(A) the applicant's Texas driver's license number or the number of a personal identification card issued by the Department of Public Safety;

(B) if the applicant has not been issued a number described by Paragraph (A), the last four digits of the applicant's social security number; or

(C) a statement by the applicant that the applicant has not been issued a number described by Paragraph (A) or (B);

(9) if the application is made by an agent, a statement of the agent's relationship to the applicant; and

(10) the city and county in which the applicant formerly resided.

(c-1) The information required under Subsections (c)(3), (4), (5), (6), and (8) must be supplied by the person desiring to register to vote.

(d) The omission of the applicant's middle or former name under Subsection (c)(1) or the applicant's zip code under Subsection (c)(7) does not affect the validity of a registration application, and the registrar may not reject the application because of that omission.

(e) A person who is certified for participation in the address confidentiality program administered by the attorney general under Subchapter B, Chapter 58, Code of Criminal Procedure, is not eligible for early voting by mail under Section 82.007 unless the person submits an application under this section by personal delivery. The secretary of state may adopt rules to implement this subsection.

(f) Instead of the statement required by Subsection (c)(5), an applicant who has been determined to be partially mentally incapacitated without the right to vote by a court and who is eligible to register because of Section 1.020(b) shall include in the application a statement that the person's guardianship has been modified to include the right to vote or the person's mental capacity has been completely restored, as applicable, by a final judgment of a court.

(g) Instead of the statement required by Subsection (c)(5), an applicant who has been determined to be totally mentally incapacitated by a court and who is eligible to register because of Section 1.020(a) shall include in the application a statement that the person's mental capacity has been completely restored by a final judgment of a court.

(h) The submission of a federal postcard application constitutes an application for registration under this section at the voting residence address stated on the application. This subsection does not apply to a person who indicates on the person's federal postcard application that the person is residing outside the United States indefinitely. The secretary of state shall prescribe rules to implement this subsection, including:

(1) rules providing directions to court clerks regarding the inclusion on jury lists of persons who submit federal postcard applications; and

(2) rules relating to whether a person who submits a federal postcard application is to be considered a registered voter of the applicable authority for the purposes of determining the number of signatures required on a petition.

(i) An applicant who wishes to receive an exemption from the requirements of Section 63.001(b) on the basis of disability must submit:

(1) written documentation:

(A) from the United States Social Security Administration evidencing the applicant has been determined to have a disability; or

(B) from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs evidencing the applicant has a disability rating of at least 50 percent; and

(2) a statement in a form prescribed by the secretary of state that the applicant does not have a form of identification acceptable under Section 63.0101.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 436, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 920, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 7.02, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 30(c), eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 390, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 454, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1315, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1049 (H.B. 1268), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2006.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 614 (H.B. 417), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1295 (S.B. 74), Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(11), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (H.B. 536), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 632 (H.B. 1448), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (S.B. 14), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1178 (S.B. 910), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 4173), Sec. 2.25, eff. January 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 2.01, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 13.0021. ADDITIONAL REGISTRATION INFORMATION FROM CERTAIN FEDERAL AND STATE JUDGES, FEDERAL OFFICIALS, AND FAMILY MEMBERS. (a) In this section, "family member" has the meaning assigned by Section 31.006, Finance Code.

(b) If the registration applicant is a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a state judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a family member of a state judge, a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, or a United States attorney, the registrar of the county shall omit the applicant's residence address from the registration list.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (H.B. 41), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 465 (S.B. 281), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1259 (H.B. 559), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 190 (S.B. 42), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 190 (S.B. 42), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2910), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 383 (S.B. 1134), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 13.003. APPLICATION BY AGENT. (a) An applicant may appoint, either orally or in writing, an agent to perform one or more of the following acts for the applicant:

(1) complete and sign a registration application;

(2) submit an application;

(3) act on the applicant's behalf in the process of approving the application, including a challenge of the applicant;

(4) receive a registration certificate in person; and

(5) submit a notice or other applicable document for correcting registration information.

(b) To be eligible for appointment as an agent, a person must:

(1) be the applicant's spouse, parent, or child; and

(2) be a qualified voter of the county or have submitted a registration application and be otherwise eligible to vote.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 436, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 13.004. RECORDING AND DISCLOSURE OF CERTAIN INFORMATION BY REGISTRAR. (a) The registrar may not transcribe, copy, or otherwise record a telephone number furnished on a registration application.

(b) The registrar may transcribe, copy, or otherwise record a social security number furnished on a registration application only in maintaining the accuracy of the registration records.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(c) The following information furnished on a registration application is confidential and does not constitute public information for purposes of Chapter 552, Government Code:

(1) a social security number;

(2) a Texas driver's license number;

(3) a number of a personal identification card issued by the Department of Public Safety;

(4) the residence address of the applicant, if the applicant is a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a state judge, a family member of a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a state judge, the spouse of a peace officer as defined by Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure, or an individual to whom Section 552.1175, Government Code, or Section 521.1211, Transportation Code, applies and the applicant:

(A) included an affidavit with the registration application describing the applicant's status under this subdivision, if the applicant is a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a state judge or a family member of a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a state judge;

(B) provided the registrar with an affidavit describing the applicant's status under this subdivision, if the applicant is a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a state judge or a family member of a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a state judge; or

(C) provided the registrar with a completed form approved by the secretary of state for the purpose of notifying the registrar of the applicant's status under this subdivision;

(5) the residence address of the applicant, if the applicant, the applicant's child, or another person in the applicant's household is a victim of family violence as defined by Section 71.004, Family Code, who provided the registrar with:

(A) a copy of a protective order issued under Chapter 85, Family Code, or a magistrate's order for emergency protection issued under Article 17.292, Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(B) other independent documentary evidence necessary to show that the applicant, the applicant's child, or another person in the applicant's household is a victim of family violence;

(6) the residence address of the applicant, if the applicant, the applicant's child, or another person in the applicant's household is a victim of sexual assault or abuse, stalking, or trafficking of persons who provided the registrar with:

(A) a copy of a protective order issued under Subchapter A or B, Chapter 7B, Code of Criminal Procedure, or a magistrate's order for emergency protection issued under Article 17.292, Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(B) other independent documentary evidence necessary to show that the applicant, the applicant's child, or another person in the applicant's household is a victim of sexual assault or abuse, stalking, or trafficking of persons;

(7) the residence address of the applicant, if the applicant:

(A) is a participant in the address confidentiality program administered by the attorney general under Subchapter B, Chapter 58, Code of Criminal Procedure; and

(B) provided the registrar with proof of certification under Article 58.059, Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(8) the telephone number of any applicant submitting documentation under Subdivision (4), (5), (6), or (7).

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(c) The following information furnished on a registration application is confidential and does not constitute public information for purposes of Chapter 552, Government Code:

(1) a social security number;

(2) a Texas driver's license number;

(3) a number of a personal identification card issued by the Department of Public Safety;

(4) the residence address of the applicant, if the applicant is a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a state judge, a family member of a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a state judge, the spouse of a peace officer as defined by Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, or an individual to whom Section 552.1175, Government Code, or Section 521.1211, Transportation Code, applies and the applicant:

(A) included an affidavit with the registration application describing the applicant's status under this subdivision, if the applicant is a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a state judge or a family member of a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a state judge;

(B) provided the registrar with an affidavit describing the applicant's status under this subdivision, if the applicant is a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a state judge or a family member of a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a state judge; or

(C) provided the registrar with a completed form approved by the secretary of state for the purpose of notifying the registrar of the applicant's status under this subdivision;

(5) the residence address of the applicant, if the applicant, the applicant's child, or another person in the applicant's household is a victim of family violence as defined by Section 71.004, Family Code, who provided the registrar with:

(A) a copy of a protective order issued under Chapter 85, Family Code, or a magistrate's order for emergency protection issued under Article 17.292, Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(B) other independent documentary evidence necessary to show that the applicant, the applicant's child, or another person in the applicant's household is a victim of family violence;

(6) the residence address of the applicant, if the applicant, the applicant's child, or another person in the applicant's household is a victim of sexual assault or abuse, stalking, or trafficking of persons who provided the registrar with:

(A) a copy of a protective order issued under Subchapter A or B, Chapter 7B, Code of Criminal Procedure, or a magistrate's order for emergency protection issued under Article 17.292, Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(B) other independent documentary evidence necessary to show that the applicant, the applicant's child, or another person in the applicant's household is a victim of sexual assault or abuse, stalking, or trafficking of persons;

(7) the residence address of the applicant, if the applicant:

(A) is a participant in the address confidentiality program administered by the attorney general under Subchapter B, Chapter 58, Code of Criminal Procedure; and

(B) provided the registrar with proof of certification under Article 58.059, Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(8) the telephone number of any applicant submitting documentation under Subdivision (4), (5), (6), or (7).

(c-1) The registrar shall ensure that the information listed in Subsection (c) is excluded from disclosure, except that the registrar shall forward to the county chair of each county executive committee the information necessary to contact applicants who indicate interest in working as an election judge.

(d) The voter registrar or other county official who has access to the information furnished on a registration application may not post the following information on a website:

(1) a telephone number;

(2) a social security number;

(3) a driver's license number or a number of a personal identification card;

(4) a date of birth; or

(5) the residence address of a voter who submits documentation under Subsection (c)(4), (5), (6), or (7) to the voter registrar or regarding whom the registrar has received notification under Section 15.0215.

(e) Documentation submitted under Subsection (c)(4), (5), (6), or (7) shall be retained on file with the voter registration application.

(f) In this section, "family member" has the meaning assigned by Section 31.006, Finance Code.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 454, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 606, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 487 (H.B. 345), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 487 (H.B. 345), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1049 (H.B. 1268), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2006.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (H.B. 41), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 465 (S.B. 281), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 1632), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 41 (S.B. 256), Sec. 6, eff. May 19, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 462 (H.B. 2015), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 713 (H.B. 4034), Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 4173), Sec. 2.26, eff. January 1, 2021.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 489 (H.B. 3100), Sec. 1, eff. June 7, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2910), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 383 (S.B. 1134), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 383 (S.B. 1134), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 6.001, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.045, eff. January 1, 2025.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 7.001, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 13.005. UNLAWFULLY ACTING AS AGENT. (a) A person commits an offense if the person acts as an agent for an applicant but is not eligible for appointment as an agent under Section 13.003(b).

(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.006. PURPORTEDLY ACTING AS AGENT. (a) A person commits an offense if the person purports to act as an agent in applying for registration or in signing a registration application at a time when the person:

(1) is not an agent of the applicant under Section 13.003(a); and

(2) is not eligible for appointment under Section 13.003(b) as the agent of the person for whom the person purports to act.

(b) An offense under this section is a felony of the third degree.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 13.007. FALSE STATEMENT ON APPLICATION. (a) A person commits an offense if the person knowingly or intentionally:

(1) makes a false statement; or

(2) requests, commands, coerces, or attempts to induce another person to make a false statement on a registration application.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor, except that an offense under this section is a state jail felony if the person:

(1) directly or through a third party offers or provides compensation or other benefit to a person for activity described by Subsection (a); or

(2) solicits, receives, or accepts compensation or other benefit for an activity described by Subsection (a).

(c) If conduct that constitutes an offense under this section also constitutes an offense under another law, the actor may be prosecuted under this section, the other law, or both.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 436, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 2.02, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 13.008. PERFORMANCE-BASED COMPENSATION FOR REGISTERING VOTERS PROHIBITED. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) compensates another person based on the number of voter registrations that the other person successfully facilitates;

(2) presents another person with a quota of voter registrations to facilitate as a condition of payment or employment;

(3) engages in another practice that causes another person's compensation from or employment status with the person to be dependent on the number of voter registrations that the other person facilitates; or

(4) accepts compensation for an activity described by Subdivision (1), (2), or (3).

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

(c) An officer, director, or other agent of an entity that commits an offense under this section is punishable for the offense.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1002 (H.B. 2194), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. VOLUNTEER DEPUTY REGISTRARS; HIGH SCHOOL DEPUTY REGISTRARS

Sec. 13.031. APPOINTMENT; TERM. (a) To encourage voter registration, the registrar shall appoint as deputy registrars persons who volunteer to serve.

(b) In this code, "volunteer deputy registrar" means a deputy registrar appointed under this section.

(c) Volunteer deputy registrars serve for terms expiring December 31 of even-numbered years.

(d) To be eligible for appointment as a volunteer deputy registrar, a person must:

(1) be 18 years of age or older;

(2) not have been finally convicted of a felony or, if so convicted, must have:

(A) fully discharged the person's sentence, including any term of incarceration, parole, or supervision, or completed a period of probation ordered by any court; or

(B) been pardoned or otherwise released from the resulting disability to vote;

(3) meet the requirements to be a qualified voter under Section 11.002 except that the person is not required to be a registered voter; and

(4) not have been finally convicted of an offense under Section 32.51, Penal Code.

(e) A volunteer deputy registrar appointed under this section may not receive another person's registration application until the deputy registrar has completed training developed under Section 13.047. At the time of appointment, the voter registrar shall provide information about the times and places at which training is offered.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 307 (H.B. 488), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (H.B. 1570), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1002 (H.B. 2194), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 2817), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 5.001, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 13.032. PROHIBITION ON REFUSING TO APPOINT. A registrar may not refuse to appoint as a volunteer deputy registrar:

(1) a person eligible for appointment under Section 13.031(d); or

(2) any person on the basis of sex, race, creed, color, or national origin or ancestry.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 307 (H.B. 488), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 13.033. CERTIFICATE OF APPOINTMENT. (a) A person desiring to serve as a volunteer deputy registrar must request appointment by the registrar in person or by mail.

(b) If a person is to be appointed, the registrar shall prepare a certificate of appointment in duplicate containing:

(1) the date of appointment;

(2) the statement: "I, ____________, Voter Registrar for ____________ County, do hereby appoint ____________ as a volunteer deputy registrar for ____________ County.";

(3) the person's residence address;

(4) the person's voter registration number, if any;

(5) a statement that the term of the appointment expires December 31 of an even-numbered year; and

(6) a statement that the appointment terminates on the person's final conviction for an offense for failure to deliver a registration application and may terminate on the registrar's determination that the person failed to adequately review a registration application, intentionally destroyed or physically altered a registration application, or engaged in any other activity that conflicts with the responsibilities of a volunteer deputy registrar under this chapter.

(c) The registrar shall sign the certificate and issue the original to the appointee, who shall sign it on receipt.

(d) A volunteer deputy shall present the certificate as identification to an applicant for registration, on request, when receiving the application for delivery to the registrar.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1003 (H.B. 621), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 13.034. ACTIVE APPOINTMENT FILE. (a) The registrar shall maintain a file containing the duplicate certificates of appointment of the volunteer deputy registrars whose appointments are effective.

(b) The registrar shall maintain the file in alphabetical order by deputy name on a countywide basis.

(c) Each certificate shall be retained on file during the time the appointment is effective.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.035. INACTIVE APPOINTMENT FILE. (a) The registrar shall maintain a file containing the duplicate certificates of appointment of the volunteer deputy registrars whose appointments have been terminated.

(b) The registrar shall enter the date of and reason for termination on each duplicate certificate.

(c) The registrar shall maintain the file in alphabetical order by deputy name on a countywide basis.

(d) Each certificate shall be retained on file for two years after the date of termination.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.036. TERMINATION OF APPOINTMENT. (a) An appointment as a volunteer deputy registrar is terminated on:

(1) the expiration of the volunteer deputy's term of appointment; or

(2) the final conviction of the volunteer deputy for an offense prescribed by Section 13.008 or 13.043.

(b) The registrar may terminate the appointment of a volunteer deputy registrar on a determination by the registrar that the volunteer deputy:

(1) failed to adequately review a registration application as required by Section 13.039;

(2) intentionally destroyed or physically altered a registration application; or

(3) engaged in any other activity that conflicts with the responsibilities of a volunteer deputy registrar under this chapter.

(c) Immediately on the termination of an appointment, the registrar shall deliver written notice of the termination to the volunteer deputy, directing the deputy:

(1) to stop activity as a volunteer deputy registrar immediately; and

(2) to deliver the certificate of appointment, receipt forms, and registration applications and receipts in the volunteer deputy's possession to the registrar not later than the second day after the date the deputy receives the termination notice.

(d) The registrar shall reject all registration applications received by a person purporting to act as a volunteer deputy registrar after the person's appointment is terminated.

(e) The registrar may not reappoint a person whose appointment as a volunteer deputy registrar is terminated under Subsection (a)(2).

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1002 (H.B. 2194), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1003 (H.B. 621), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 13.037. COMPENSATION; BOND. (a) A person may not receive compensation from the county for service as a volunteer deputy registrar unless compensation is authorized by the commissioners court.

(b) An unpaid volunteer deputy is not required to give a bond in connection with the deputy's service.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 13.038. POWERS GENERALLY. A volunteer deputy registrar may distribute voter registration application forms throughout the county and receive registration applications submitted to the deputy in person.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 13.039. REVIEW OF APPLICATION. (a) On receipt of a registration application, a volunteer deputy registrar shall review it for completeness in the applicant's presence.

(b) If the application does not contain all the required information and the required signature, the volunteer deputy shall return the application to the applicant for completion and resubmission.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.040. ISSUANCE OF RECEIPT. (a) On receipt of a completed registration application, a volunteer deputy registrar shall prepare a receipt in duplicate on a form furnished by the registrar.

(b) The receipt must contain:

(1) the name of the applicant and, if applicable, the name of the applicant's agent; and

(2) the date the completed application is submitted to the volunteer deputy.

(c) The volunteer deputy shall sign the receipt in the applicant's presence and shall give the original to the applicant.

(d) The volunteer deputy shall deliver the duplicate receipt to the registrar with the registration application. The registrar shall retain the receipt on file with the application.

(e) The secretary of state may prescribe a procedure that is an alternative to the procedure prescribed by this section that will ensure the accountability of the registration applications.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.041. EFFECT OF SUBMISSION OF APPLICATION. The date of submission of a completed registration application to a volunteer deputy registrar is considered to be the date of submission to the registrar for the purpose of determining the effective date of registration only.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.042. DELIVERY OF APPLICATION TO REGISTRAR. (a) A volunteer deputy registrar shall deliver in person, or by personal delivery through another designated volunteer deputy, to the registrar each completed voter registration application submitted to the deputy, as provided by this section. The secretary of state shall prescribe any procedures necessary to ensure the proper and timely delivery of completed applications that are not delivered in person by the volunteer deputy who receives them.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), an application shall be delivered to the registrar not later than 5 p.m. of the fifth day after the date the application is submitted to the volunteer deputy registrar.

(c) An application submitted after the 34th day before the date of an election and on or before the last day for a person to timely submit a registration application for that election as provided by Section 13.143 shall be delivered not later than 5 p.m. of the next regular business day after the date to timely submit a registration application for that election as provided by Section 13.143.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 162 (H.B. 2324), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 13.043. FAILURE TO DELIVER APPLICATION. (a) A volunteer deputy registrar commits an offense if the deputy fails to comply with Section 13.042.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), an offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

(c) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor if the deputy's failure to comply is intentional.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.044. PURPORTEDLY ACTING AS VOLUNTEER DEPUTY REGISTRAR. (a) A person commits an offense if the person purports to act as a volunteer deputy registrar when the person does not have an effective appointment as a volunteer deputy registrar.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.045. ACTIVITY ON GOVERNMENTAL PREMISES. Except as otherwise provided by law, the chief executive of a state agency with approval of the agency's governing body, if any, the chief executive of a department of a city with approval of the city's governing body, or a county officer may permit an officer or employee under the chief executive's or officer's supervision who is a volunteer deputy registrar to engage in official registration activities during working hours on the premises under the chief executive's or officer's control.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.046. HIGH SCHOOL DEPUTY REGISTRARS. (a) Each principal of a public or private high school or the principal's designee shall serve as a deputy registrar for the county in which the school is located.

(b) In this code, "high school deputy registrar" means a deputy registrar serving under this section.

(c) A high school deputy registrar may distribute registration application forms to and receive registration applications submitted to the deputy in person from students and employees of the school only.

(d) At least twice each school year, a high school deputy registrar shall distribute an officially prescribed registration application form to each student who is or will be 18 years of age or older during that year, subject to rules prescribed by the secretary of state.

(e) Each application form distributed under this section must be accompanied by a notice informing the student or employee that the application may be submitted in person or by mail to the voter registrar of the county in which the applicant resides or in person to a high school deputy registrar or volunteer deputy registrar for delivery to the voter registrar of the county in which the applicant resides.

(f) Except as provided by this subsection, Sections 13.039, 13.041, and 13.042 apply to the submission and delivery of registration applications under this section, and for that purpose, "volunteer deputy registrar" in those sections includes a high school deputy registrar. A high school deputy registrar may review an application for completeness out of the applicant's presence. A deputy may deliver a group of applications to the registrar by mail in an envelope or package, and, for the purpose of determining compliance with the delivery deadline, an application delivered by mail is considered to be delivered at the time of its receipt by the registrar.

(g) A high school deputy registrar commits an offense if the deputy fails to comply with Section 13.042. An offense under this subsection is a Class C misdemeanor unless the deputy's failure to comply is intentional, in which case the offense is a Class A misdemeanor.

(h) The secretary of state shall prescribe any additional procedures necessary to implement this section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 13.047. TRAINING STANDARDS FOR DEPUTY REGISTRARS. (a) The secretary of state shall:

(1) adopt standards of training in election law relating to the registration of voters;

(2) develop materials for a standardized curriculum for that training; and

(3) distribute the materials as necessary to each county voter registrar.

(b) The training standards may include the passage of an examination at the end of a training program.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (H.B. 1570), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 13.048. OPTIONAL PROCEDURE FOR APPOINTMENT OF VOLUNTEER DEPUTY REGISTRAR; PROVISION OF TRAINING MATERIALS ON SECRETARY OF STATE WEBSITE. (a) A county may adopt a method of appointment for volunteer deputy registrars prescribed by the secretary of state or developed by the county and approved by the secretary of state under this section that provides for the training and examination of potential volunteer deputy registrars.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the secretary of state shall:

(1) provide on the secretary of state's website the training materials prescribed by the secretary of state under Section 13.047 for volunteer deputy registrars; and

(2) prescribe and make available on the secretary of state's website an examination based on those materials.

(c) A county that has adopted the method under this section:

(1) shall administer the required examination to a potential volunteer deputy registrar at any time during the county voter registrar's regular business hours; and

(2) is not required to hold in-person training sessions for potential volunteer deputy registrars.

(d) At the time a person satisfactorily completes the examination in compliance with standards adopted by the secretary of state, the registrar shall appoint the person as a volunteer deputy registrar and advise the person:

(1) of county-specific procedures for processing voter registration applications, if applicable; and

(2) that the only requirements for voter registration are those prescribed by state law or by the secretary of state.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1269 (S.B. 142), Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER C. ACTION ON APPLICATION BY REGISTRAR

Sec. 13.071. REVIEW OF APPLICATION. (a) The registrar shall review each submitted application for registration to determine whether it complies with Section 13.002 and indicates that the applicant is eligible for registration.

(b) The registrar shall make the determination not later than the seventh day after the date the application is submitted to the registrar.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.072. ACTION ON APPLICATION. (a) Unless the registrar challenges the applicant, the registrar shall approve the application if:

(1) the registrar determines that an application complies with Section 13.002 and indicates that the applicant is eligible for registration; and

(2) for an applicant who has not included a statement described by Section 13.002(c)(8)(C), the registrar verifies with the secretary of state:

(A) the applicant's Texas driver's license number or number of a personal identification card issued by the Department of Public Safety; or

(B) the last four digits of the applicant's social security number.

(b) After approval of an application by an applicant who was registered in another county at the time of application, the registrar shall deliver written notice of the applicant's change of residence to the other county's registrar and include in the notice the applicant's name, former residence address, and former registration number, if known.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), if the registrar determines that an application does not comply with Section 13.002 or does not indicate that the applicant is eligible for registration, the registrar shall reject the application.

(d) If an application clearly indicates that the applicant resides in another county, the registrar shall forward the application to the other county's registrar not later than the second day after the date the application is received. The date of submission of a completed application to the wrong registrar is considered to be the date of submission to the proper registrar for purposes of determining the effective date of the registration.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 44, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 415, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 559, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 5, 44, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 2280), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2006.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 13.073. NOTICE OF REJECTION. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the registrar shall deliver written notice of the reason for the rejection of an application to the applicant not later than the second day after the date of rejection.

(b) If the registrar rejects an application in the applicant's presence, at that time the registrar shall orally inform the applicant of the reason for the rejection. If the rejection is for incompleteness, the registrar shall return the application to the applicant for completion and resubmission.

(c) If the registrar rejects an application for incompleteness but receives a completed application not later than the 10th day after the date the notice is delivered under Subsection (a) or the date the incomplete application is returned under Subsection (b), as applicable, the original date of submission of the incomplete application is considered to be the date of submission to the registrar for the purpose of determining the effective date of registration.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 13.074. CHALLENGE OF APPLICANT. (a) If after determining that an application complies with Section 13.002 and indicates that the applicant is eligible for registration, the registrar has reason to believe the applicant is not eligible for registration or the application was submitted in an unauthorized manner, the registrar shall challenge the applicant.

(b) The registrar shall indicate on the application of a challenged applicant that the applicant's eligibility or the manner of submission of the application has been challenged and the date of the challenge.

(c) The registrar may not challenge an applicant later than the second day after the date the application is determined to comply with Section 13.002 and indicate that the applicant is eligible for registration.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.075. NOTICE OF CHALLENGE TO APPLICANT. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c), the registrar shall deliver written notice of the challenge to the applicant not later than the second day after the date of the challenge.

(b) The notice must include:

(1) the date of the challenge;

(2) a statement of the grounds for the challenge; and

(3) a brief explanation of the applicant's right to a hearing on the challenge and the right to appeal the registrar's decision.

(c) If a challenge is made in the applicant's presence, at that time the registrar shall orally explain to the applicant the grounds for the challenge and the applicant's right to a hearing and appeal.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.076. REQUEST FOR HEARING ON CHALLENGE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), to be entitled to a hearing on a challenge, the applicant must file a written, signed request for a hearing with the registrar not later than the 10th day after the date of the challenge.

(b) If a challenge is made in the applicant's presence, at that time the applicant may orally request a hearing.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.077. HEARING ON CHALLENGE. (a) On the timely filing or making of a hearing request, the registrar shall schedule a hearing on the challenge.

(b) The registrar shall conduct the hearing not later than the 10th day after the date the request is filed or made or at a later date on the applicant's request.

(c) The applicant may appear personally at the hearing to offer evidence or argument. The applicant may offer evidence or argument by affidavit without personally appearing if the applicant submits the affidavit to the registrar before the hearing begins.

(d) If a challenge is made in the applicant's presence and the applicant orally requests a hearing, the hearing may be conducted at that time with the applicant's consent.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.078. NOTICE OF HEARING. (a) The registrar shall deliver to a challenged applicant written notice of the date, hour, and place set for the hearing on the challenge not later than the second day after the date the hearing request is filed or made.

(b) This section does not apply to a hearing conducted under Section 13.077(d).

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.079. DETERMINATION OF CHALLENGE. (a) After hearing and considering the evidence or argument, the registrar shall promptly determine the challenge and issue a decision in writing.

(b) If the registrar determines that the applicant is eligible for registration or that the manner of submission of the application was authorized, the registrar shall approve the application.

(c) If the registrar determines that the applicant is not eligible for registration or that the manner of submission of the application was unauthorized, the registrar shall reject the application.

(d) The registrar shall retain a copy of the decision on file with the applicant's registration application and shall deliver a copy to the applicant.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.080. RECORDING REJECTION. On rejection of an applicant's registration application, the registrar shall enter the date of and reason for the rejection on the application.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

SUBCHAPTER D. APPLICATION FILES

Sec. 13.101. ACTIVE APPLICATION FILE. (a) The registrar shall maintain a file containing the approved registration applications of the registered voters of the county.

(b) The registrar shall maintain the file in alphabetical order by voter name on a countywide basis. However, the registrar may maintain the file in numerical order by registration number if the registrar regularly maintains a list of registered voters in alphabetical order by voter name on a countywide basis.

(c) Each application shall be retained on file during the time the registration is effective.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.102. INACTIVE APPLICATION FILE. (a) The registrar shall maintain a file containing the rejected applications of applicants for registration.

(b) The registrar shall maintain a file, separate from the file maintained under Subsection (a), containing the applications of the voters whose registrations have been canceled.

(c) The registrar shall maintain each file in alphabetical order by applicant or voter name on a countywide basis.

(d) Each application shall be retained on file for two years after the date of rejection or cancellation.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.103. PLACE FOR KEEPING FILES; SECURITY. (a) The registration application files maintained under this subchapter shall be kept in the registrar's office at all times in a place and manner ensuring their security.

(b) Applications may be removed from the registrar's office temporarily, in a manner ensuring their security, for use in preparing registration certificates, lists of registered voters, and other registration documents by electronic data-processing methods.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.104. OPTIONAL STORAGE METHOD. (a) Instead of keeping the original registration applications and supporting documentation as required by this title, the registrar may record the applications and documentation on an optical disk or other computer storage medium approved by the secretary of state.

(b) The storage medium must allow for the creation of a copy of an application or supporting documentation.

(c) The secretary of state shall prescribe any procedures necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER E. OFFICIAL APPLICATION FORMS

Sec. 13.121. OFFICIAL FORM FOR REGISTRATION BY MAIL. (a) The officially prescribed application form for registration by mail must be in the form of a business reply postcard, unless another form or system is used under Subsection (b), with postage paid by the state. The secretary of state shall design the form to enhance the legibility of its contents.

(b) The secretary of state shall obtain a permit from the United States Postal Service for use of the postage-paid application form and shall arrange for payment of the postal charges with warrants issued by the comptroller of public accounts. The secretary may use any other form or system made available by the United States Postal Service if the form or system is less costly than the business reply system.

(c) The secretary of state shall have the official application forms for registration by mail printed and shall furnish the forms without charge to each registrar in a quantity the secretary determines sufficient for the proper conduct of voter registration.

(d) The secretary of state shall prescribe the procedures necessary to implement this section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1315, Sec. 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Sec. 13.122. ADDITIONAL ELEMENTS ON OFFICIAL FORM. (a) In addition to the other statements and spaces for entering information that appear on an officially prescribed registration application form, each official form must include:

(1) the statement: "I understand that giving false information to procure a voter registration is perjury and a crime under state and federal law.";

(2) a space for the applicant's registration number;

(3) a space for the applicant's Texas driver's license number or number of a personal identification card issued by the Department of Public Safety;

(4) a space for the applicant's telephone number;

(5) a space for the applicant's social security number;

(6) a space for the applicant's sex;

(7) a statement indicating that the furnishing of the applicant's telephone number and sex is optional;

(8) a space or box for indicating whether the applicant or voter is submitting new registration information or a change in current registration information;

(9) a statement instructing a voter who is using the form to make a change in current registration information to enter the voter's name and the changed information in the appropriate spaces on the form;

(10) a statement that if the applicant declines to register to vote, that fact will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes;

(11) a statement that if the applicant does register to vote, information regarding the agency or office to which the application is submitted will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes;

(12) a space or box for indicating whether the applicant is interested in working as an election judge;

(13) a statement warning that a conviction for making a false statement may result in imprisonment for up to the maximum amount of time provided by law, a fine of up to the maximum amount provided by law, or both the imprisonment and the fine; and

(14) any other voter registration information required by federal law or considered appropriate and required by the secretary of state.

(b) The term "residence address" may not be modified on an official registration application form by terms other than those comprising the specific elements of a residence address.

(c) If it becomes permissible under federal law to require an applicant for registration who has a social security number to furnish the number, the secretary of state may implement that requirement.

(d) Expired.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 6.03, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 442, Sec. 7, eff. Jan. 1, 1992; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 559, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 631, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 30(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 454, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1315, Sec. 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1049 (H.B. 1268), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2006.

SUBCHAPTER F. INITIAL REGISTRATION

Sec. 13.141. REGISTRATION NUMBER. The secretary of state shall prescribe a uniform system for assigning voter registration numbers.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 2280), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2006.

Sec. 13.142. INITIAL REGISTRATION CERTIFICATE. (a) After approval of a registration application, the registrar shall:

(1) prepare a voter registration certificate and issue the original certificate to the applicant; and

(2) enter the applicant's county election precinct number and registration number on the applicant's registration application.

(b) In this code, "initial certificate" means a registration certificate issued under this section.

(c) An initial certificate takes effect on the effective date of the registration and expires the following January 1 of an even-numbered year.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 436, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 53, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 13.143. EFFECTIVE DATE OF REGISTRATION; PERIOD OF EFFECTIVENESS. (a) Except as provided by Subsections (b) and (e), if an applicant's registration application is approved, the registration becomes effective on the 30th day after the date the application is submitted to the registrar or on the date the applicant becomes 18 years of age, whichever is later.

(b) A registration is effective for purposes of early voting if it will be effective on election day.

(c) A registration is effective until canceled under this code.

(d) For purposes of determining the effective date of a registration, an application submitted by:

(1) mail is considered to be submitted to the registrar on the date it is placed with postage prepaid and properly addressed in the United States mail; or

(2) telephonic facsimile machine is considered to be submitted to the registrar on the date the transmission is received by the registrar, subject to Subsection (d-2).

(d-1) The date indicated by the post office cancellation mark is considered to be the date the application was placed in the mail unless proven otherwise.

(d-2) For a registration application submitted by telephonic facsimile machine to be effective, a copy of the original registration application containing the voter's original signature must be submitted by personal delivery or mail and be received by the registrar not later than the fourth business day after the transmission by telephonic facsimile machine is received.

(e) If the 30th day before the date of an election is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal state or national holiday, an application is considered to be timely if it is submitted to the registrar on or before the next regular business day.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 416, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.31; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 454, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1178 (S.B. 910), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 13.144. DELIVERY OF INITIAL CERTIFICATE TO VOTER. (a) Not later than the 30th day after the date the registrar receives the application, the registrar shall deliver the original of an initial certificate:

(1) in person to the applicant or the applicant's agent appointed under Section 13.003; or

(2) by mail to the applicant.

(b) If delivery is by mail, the registrar shall send the certificate to the mailing address on the applicant's registration application.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 844, Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 844 (H.B. 1044), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 844 (H.B. 1044), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 13.145. UNLAWFUL DELIVERY OF CERTIFICATE. (a) A voter registrar commits an offense if the registrar knowingly delivers a registration certificate to a person other than the applicant or the applicant's agent appointed under Section 13.003.

(b) An offense under this section is a felony of the third degree.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 13.146. CONFIRMATION NOTICE ON RETURN OF INITIAL CERTIFICATE. (a) If an initial certificate delivered to the applicant by mail is returned to the registrar undelivered, the registrar shall promptly deliver to the applicant a confirmation notice in accordance with Section 15.051.

(b) If the applicant fails to submit a response to the registrar in accordance with Section 15.053, the registrar shall enter the applicant's name on the suspense list.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 5.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.